Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,292
Bed and breakfast establishments; exempt from act.

The Nebraska Pure Food Act shall not apply to bed and breakfast establishments.

Laws 1989, LB 548, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-216.38;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 61.